Utah statutes.
78A-6-1003.   Costs and expenses of trial.

The fees and expenses, the cost of publication of summons, and the expense of a trial of an adult, when approved by the court, are paid by the state, except prosecution costs and public defender costs are paid by the county where the hearing or trial is held.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

